Utah statutes.
18-1-2.   Dogs acting together -- Actions -- Parties -- Judgment.
Where any injury has been committed by two or more dogs acting together and
such dogs are owned or kept by different persons, all such persons may be
joined as defendants in the same action to recover damages therefor, and the
amount found by the court or jury as damages for such injury shall be
apportioned among the several defendants found liable and judgment shall be
entered severally against them for the amount so apportioned.
